Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-603
Eminent domain; rights of condemner.

Whenever any condemner shall require the right to underground storage in any of the lands within this state, such condemner may file an action to condemn and acquire such underground storage in and under the lands sought to be condemned, including the amount of commercially recoverable native gas, if any, remaining in the reservoir, together with such other rights or interests as may be necessary and proper to the full enjoyment thereof; Provided, that any right of underground storage obtainable hereunder shall be without prejudice to the rights of the owners of the surface of such land or other interests therein as to all other uses thereof.

Laws 1953, c. 191, § 3(1), p. 614;

Laws 1963, c. 325, § 3, p. 985.